zh-TW: 反彈表面配置: 雙面 (規則和不規則); 雙面 (小球/大球); 多面; 單面 (規則); 單面 (不規則); 其他
nb: Konfigurasjon av returoverflaten: Tosidig (forutsigbar og uforutsigbar); Tosidig (liten ball / stor ball); Flersidig; Enkeltsidig (forutsigbar); Enkeltsidig (uforutsigbar); Annet
pt-BR: Rebote superfície configuração: Dupla face (previsível e imprevisível); Dupla face (bola pequena/bola grande); Múltiplas faces; Face única (previsível); Face única (imprevisível); Outra
zh-CN: 回弹面配置: 双面（可预测与不可预测）; 双面（小球/大球）; 多面; 单面（可预测）; 单面（不可预测）; 其他
ja: 反発面構成: 両面 (予測可能および予測不可能); 両面 (小ボール/大ボール); 多面; 片面 (予測可能); 片面 (予測不可能); その他
it: Configurazione della superficie di rimbalzo: Doppio lato (prevedibile e imprevedibile); Doppio lato (palla piccola/palla grande); Multilaterale; Singolo lato (prevedibile); Singolo lato (imprevedibile); Altro
pt-PT: Configuração da superfície de rebote: Duas faces (previsível e imprevisível); Duas faces (bola pequena/bola grande); Multiface; Uma face (previsível); Uma face (imprevisível); Outro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija odbojne površine: Obojestransko (predvidljivo in nepredvidljivo); Obojestransko (majhna žoga / velika žoga); Večstransko; Enostransko (predvidljivo); Enostransko (nepredvidljivo); Drugo
bg-BG: Конфигурация на повърхността за отскок: Двустранен (предвидим и непредвидим отскок); Двустранен (малка топка / голяма топка); Многостранен; Едностранен (предвидим отскок); Едностранен (непредвидим отскок); Други
ro-RO: Configurația suprafeței de revenire: Cu două fețe (predictibilă și impredictibilă); Cu două fețe (minge mică / minge mare); Cu fețe multiple; Cu o singură față (predictibilă); Cu o singură față (impredictibilă); Altele
lt-LT: Atšokimo paviršiaus konfigūracija: Dvipusis (nuspėjamas ir nenuspėjamas); Dvipusis (mažas kamuolys / didelis kamuolys); Daugiašonis; Vienpusis (nuspėjamas); Vienpusis (nenuspėjamas); Kita
pl: Konfiguracja powierzchni odbijającej: Dwustronna (przewidywalna i nieprzewidywalna); Dwustronna (mała piłka / duża piłka); Wielostronna; Jednostronna (przewidywalna); Jednostronna (nieprzewidywalna); Inne
de: Konfiguration der Rückprallfläche: Doppelseitig (berechenbar und unberechenbar); Doppelseitig (kleiner Ball / großer Ball); Mehrseitig; Einseitig (berechenbar); Einseitig (unberechenbar); Sonstige
vi: Cấu hình bề mặt bật lại: Hai mặt (dễ đoán và ngẫu nhiên); Hai mặt (bóng nhỏ/bóng lớn); Nhiều mặt; Một mặt (dễ đoán); Một mặt (ngẫu nhiên); Khác
hu: Visszapattanó felület konfigurációja: Kétoldalas (kiszámítható és kiszámíthatatlan); Kétoldalas (kis labda / nagy labda); Többoldalas; Egyoldalas (kiszámítható); Egyoldalas (kiszámíthatatlan); Egyéb
sk-SK: Konfigurácia odrazovej plochy: Obojstranná (predvídateľná a nepredvídateľná); Obojstranná (malá lopta / veľká lopta); Viacstranná; Jednostranná (predvídateľná); Jednostranná (nepredvídateľná); Iné
el: Διαμόρφωση της επιφάνειας αναπήδησης: Διπλής όψης (προβλέψιμη και απρόβλεπτη); Διπλής όψης (μικρή μπάλα / μεγάλη μπάλα); Πολλαπλών όψεων; Μονής όψης (προβλέψιμη); Μονής όψης (απρόβλεπτη); Άλλο
ko: 반발면 구성: 양면(예측 가능 및 예측 불가능); 양면(작은 공/큰 공); 다중면; 단면(예측 가능); 단면(예측 불가능); 기타
hr-HR: Konfiguracija površine za odbijanje: Dvostrano (predvidljivo i nepredvidljivo); Dvostrano (mala lopta / velika lopta); Višestrano; Jednostrano (predvidljivo); Jednostrano (nepredvidljivo); Ostalo
es: Configuración de la superficie de rebote: Doble cara (predecible e impredecible); Doble cara (pelota pequeña/pelota grande); Múltiples caras; De una cara (predecible); De una cara (impredecible); Otra
th: รูปแบบพื้นผิวการกระดอน: สองด้าน (คาดเดาทิศทางได้และไม่ได้); สองด้าน (ลูกบอลเล็ก/ลูกบอลใหญ่); หลายด้าน; ด้านเดียว (คาดเดาทิศทางได้); ด้านเดียว (คาดเดาทิศทางไม่ได้); อื่นๆ
fr: Configuration des surfaces de rebond: Double face (prévisible et imprévisible); Double face (petite balle / grosse balle); Multi-faces; Simple face (prévisible); Simple face (imprévisible); Autre
sv: Konfiguration av rebound-ytan: Dubbelsidig (förutsägbar och oförutsägbar); Dubbelsidig (liten boll/stor boll); Flersidig; Enkelsidig (förutsägbar); Enkelsidig (oförutsägbar); Övrigt
fi: Kimpoamispintojen konfiguraatio: Kaksipuolinen (ennakoitava ja arvaamaton); Kaksipuolinen (pieni pallo / iso pallo); Monisivuinen; Yksipuolinen (ennakoitava); Yksipuolinen (arvaamaton); Muu
en: Rebound surface configuration: Dual-sided (predictable and unpredictable); Dual-sided (small ball / large ball); Multi-sided; Single-sided (predictable); Single-sided (unpredictable); Other
da: Konfiguration af strengfladens respons: Dobbeltsidet (forudsigelig og uforudsigelig); Dobbeltsidet (lille bold / stor bold); Flersidet; Enkeltsidet (forudsigelig); Enkeltsidet (uforudsigelig); Andet
ru: Конфигурация поверхности отскока: Двусторонняя (предсказуемый и непредсказуемый отскок); Двусторонняя (маленький мяч / большой мяч); Многосторонняя; Односторонняя (предсказуемый отскок); Односторонняя (непредсказуемый отскок); Другое
tr: Geri tepme yüzeyi konfigürasyonu: Çift taraflı (öngörülebilir ve öngörülemez); Çift taraflı (küçük top / büyük top); Çok taraflı; Tek taraflı (öngörülebilir); Tek taraflı (öngörülemez); Diğer
cs: Konfigurace odrazové plochy: Oboustranné (předvídatelné a nepředvídatelné); Oboustranné (malý míč / velký míč); Vícestranné; Jednostranné (předvídatelné); Jednostranné (nepředvídatelné); Ostatní
nl: Reboundoppervlak configuratie: Dubbelzijdig (voorspelbaar en onvoorspelbaar); Dubbelzijdig (kleine bal / grote bal); Meerzijdig; Enkelzijdig (voorspelbaar); Enkelzijdig (onvoorspelbaar); Overig